Utah statutes.
11-30-10.   Appeals to Supreme Court.
An appeal may be taken only to the Supreme Court and may be taken only by a
party appearing at the hearing.  No appeal is allowed unless the notice of
appeal is filed within 10 days after the date of entry of the judgment. The
Supreme Court shall expedite and give priority to the hearing and decision on
appeal.
